apertium-en-ca/partofspeech/apertium_det_pr_prn.ca.dix
   <pardef n="/el_vostre__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les<b/>vostres</l>
          <r>el<b/>vostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>la<b/>vostra</l>
          <r>el<b/>vostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>els<b/>vostres</l>
          <r>el<b/>vostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>els<b/>vostres</l>
          <r>el<b/>vostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>el<b/>vostre</l>
          <r>el<b/>vostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>el<b/>vostre</l>
          <r>el<b/>vostre<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="/l'altre__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l'altre</l>
          <r>l'altre<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>l'altra</l>
          <r>l'altre<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>els<b/>altres</l>
          <r>l'altre<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>les<b/>altres</l>
          <r>l'altre<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="altres__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="molt/s__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
       <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


 <pardef n="això__prn">       
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="alguna_cosa__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="algun__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="aquest__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="algú__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="quals/evol__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>sevol</l>
          <r>evol<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>evol</l>
          <r>evol<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>


 <pardef n="cap__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="quant__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="què__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

   <pardef n="qui__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="un/_altre__prn">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es<b/>altres</l>
          <r><b/>altre<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a<b/>altra</l>
          <r><b/>altre<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>s<b/>altres</l>
          <r><b/>altre<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l><b/>altre</l>
          <r><b/>altre<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="un/s_quants__prn">
    <e>
        <p>
          <l>s<b/>quants</l>
          <r>s<b/>quants<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es<b/>quantes</l>
          <r>s<b/>quants<s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <pardef n="que__rel">
      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/><s n="an"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

 </pardefs>

<e lm="això"><i>això</i><par n="això__prn"/></e>
<e lm="alguna cosa"><i>alguna<b/>cosa</i><par n="alguna_cosa__prn"/></e>
<e lm="algun"><i>algun</i><par n="algun__prn"/></e>
<e lm="algú"><i>algú</i><par n="algú__prn"/></e>
<e lm="allò"><i>allò</i><par n="això__prn"/></e>
<e lm="aquell"><i>aquell</i><par n="algun__prn"/></e>
<e lm="aquest"><i>aquest</i><par n="aquest__prn"/></e>
<e lm="cadascú"><i>cadascú</i><par n="algú__prn"/></e>
<e lm="cap"><i>cap</i><par n="cap__prn"/></e>
<e lm="el vostre"><par n="/el_vostre__prn"/></e>
<e lm="gaires"><p><l>gaires</l><r>gaire</r></p><par n="altres__prn"/></e>
<e lm="la majoria" r="RL"><i>la<b/>majoria</i><par n="altres__prn"/></e>
<e lm="l'altre"><i/><par n="/l'altre__prn"/></e>
<e lm="altres"><i>altres</i><par n="altres__prn"/></e>
<e lm="massa"><i>massa</i><par n="altres__prn"/></e>
<e lm="molts"><i>molt</i><par n="molt/s__prn"/></e>
<e lm="ningú"><i>ningú</i><par n="algú__prn"/></e>
<e lm="qualsevol cosa"><i>qualsevol<b/>cosa</i><par n="alguna_cosa__prn"/></e>
<e lm="qualsevol"><i>quals</i><par n="quals/evol__prn"/></e>
<e lm="quant"><i>quant</i><par n="quant__prn"/></e>
<e lm="uns quants"><i>un</i><par n="un/s_quants__prn"/></e>
<e lm="què"><i>què</i><par n="què__prn"/></e>
<e lm="quin"><i>quin</i><par n="quant__prn"/></e>
<e lm="qui"><i>qui</i><par n="qui__prn"/></e>
<e lm="res"><i>res</i><par n="algú__prn"/></e>
<e lm="tothom"><i>tothom</i><par n="algú__prn"/></e>
<e lm="tot"><i>tot</i><par n="algun__prn"/></e>
<e lm="un altre"><i>un</i><par n="un/_altre__prn"/></e>
<e lm="un"><i>un</i><par n="algun__prn"/></e>
<e lm="que"><i>que</i><par n="que__rel"/></e>
<e lm="què"><i>què</i><par n="que__rel"/></e>
